Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. Submission, Filing, and Publication of Regulations.

Sec. 44.62.040.
Submitting regulations.

Subject to (c) of this section, every state agency that by statute possesses regulation-making authority shall submit to the lieutenant governor for filing a certified original and one duplicate copy of every regulation or order of repeal adopted by it, except one that

establishes or fixes rates, prices, or tariffs;

relates to the use of public works, including streets and highways, under the jurisdiction of a state agency if the effect of the order is indicated to the public by means of signs or signals; or

is directed to a specifically named person or to a group of persons and does not apply generally throughout the state.

Citation of the general statutory authority under which a regulation is adopted, as well as citation of specific statutory sections being implemented, interpreted, or made clear, must follow the text of each regulation submitted under (a) of this section.

Before submitting the regulations and orders of repeal to the lieutenant governor under (a) of this section, every state agency that by statute possesses regulation making authority, except the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, the Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, the office of victims’ rights, and the office of the ombudsman, shall submit to the governor for review a copy of every regulation or order of repeal adopted by the agency, except regulations and orders of repeal identified in (a)(1) and (2) of this section. The governor may review the regulations and orders of repeal received under this subsection. The governor may return the regulations and orders of repeal to the adopting agency before they are submitted to the lieutenant governor for filing under (a) of this section within 30 days if they are inconsistent with the faithful execution of the laws. The governor may not delegate the governor’s review authority under this subsection to a person other than the lieutenant governor.

History.

(§ 1 art II (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 1969; am §§ 2, 3 ch 64 SLA 1995; am § 27 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 2014; am § 12 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, at the end of the first sentence of subsection (c), “of this section” was inserted to correct a manifest error in § 3, ch. 64, SLA 1995.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 14, 2014, in (c), in the first sentence, substituted “the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, the Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission” for “boards and commissions” following “regulation making authority, except” and made a stylistic change, in the third sentence, inserted “within 30 days” following “under (a) of this section”.

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in the third sentence of (c), deleted “, or (2) to enable the adopting agency to respond to specific issues raised by the Administrative Regulation Review Committee”, and made a related change.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 12, ch. 87, SLA 2014, the 2014 amendments to subsection (c) apply “to proposed regulations first published under AS

44.62.190

on or after October 14, 2014.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

Alaska’s statutes establish that filing of regulations by the office of the lieutenant governor is a mandatory duty. The statutes do not confer discretion on the lieutenant governor to decide not to file the regulations; accordingly, the duty is ministerial. The purpose of the filing requirement is to provide public notice of the regulations, not to provide the lieutenant governor with veto power over regulations adopted in accordance with the APA. January 1, 1994 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 44.62.050.
Style and forms.

The Department of Law shall prepare and shall revise when necessary a drafting manual for administrative regulations that prescribes the style and forms for submitting regulations under AS

44.62.040

.

History.

(§ 2 art II (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 70 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 1978)

Sec. 44.62.060.
Preparation and filing.

Every state agency that by statute possesses regulation-making authority shall work with the Department of Law, under AS

44.62.125

, in the preparation and revision of its regulations and shall adhere to the drafting manual for administrative regulations prepared by the Department of Law under AS

44.62.050

.

In the performance of duties under AS

44.62.125

, the Department of Law shall advise the agencies on legal matters relevant to the adoption of regulations and may advise the agencies on the need for and the policy involved in particular regulations. In addition, the department shall prepare a written statement of approval or disapproval after each regulation has been reviewed in order to determine

its legality, constitutionality, and consistency with other regulations;

the existence of statutory authority and the correctness of the required citation of statutory authority following each section;

its clarity, simplicity of expression, and absence of possibility of misapplication;

compliance with the drafting manual for administrative regulations.

The lieutenant governor may not accept for filing a regulation, amendment, or order of repeal required by AS

44.62.040

unless it is accompanied by the written statement specified in (b) of this section and the statement approves the regulation, amendment, or order of repeal.

History.

(§ 3 art II (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 149 SLA 1962; am § 4 ch 70 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1969; am § 2 ch 64 SLA 1978)

Sec. 44.62.070.
Fees.

A state officer or public official may not charge a fee to perform an official act in connection with the certification, submission, or filing of regulations under AS

44.62.040

—

44.62.120

.

History.

(§ 4 art II (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 40 SLA 1969)

Sec. 44.62.080.
Endorsement and filing.

The lieutenant governor shall

endorse on the certified copy of each regulation or order of repeal filed, the time and date of filing; and

maintain, for five years after filing, a permanent file of the certified copies of regulations and orders of repeal for public inspection; after the certified copies have been on file for five years, the lieutenant governor shall transfer the permanent file of the copies to the state archivist (AS

40.21.020

) annually, on or before January 1 of each year.

The state archivist shall have and maintain, for public inspection, the permanent file of the certified copies of regulations and orders of repeal transferred to the archivist by the lieutenant governor under (a)(2) of this section.

History.

(§ 5 art II (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 40 SLA 1969; am E.O. 103 §§ 2, 3 (2002))

Sec. 44.62.090.
Filing with local government unit clerks. [Repealed, § 2 ch 57 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 44.62.100.
Presumptions from filing.

The filing of a certified copy of a regulation or an order of repeal by the lieutenant governor raises the rebuttable presumptions that

it was duly adopted;

it was duly filed and made available for public inspection at the day and hour endorsed on it;

all requirements of this chapter and the regulations relative to the regulation have been complied with;

the text of the certified copy of a regulation or order of repeal is the text of the regulation or order of repeal as adopted.

The courts shall take judicial notice of the contents of the certified copy of each regulation and of each order of repeal duly filed.

History.

(§ 7 art II (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 40 SLA 1969)

Sec. 44.62.110.
Presumptions from publication.

The publication of a regulation in the Alaska Administrative Code or register raises a rebuttable presumption that the text of the regulation as so published is the text of the regulation adopted.

The courts shall take judicial notice of the contents of each regulation or notice of the repeal of a regulation printed in the Alaska Administrative Code or Alaska Administrative Register.

History.

(§ 8 art II (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.62.120.
Voluntary submitting and publication.

With the approval of the lieutenant governor, a state agency may submit to the lieutenant governor for filing a regulation or order of repeal of a regulation not required by AS

44.62.040

to be submitted.
If the lieutenant governor accepts the regulation or order of repeal, the lieutenant governor shall endorse and file it as required in AS

44.62.080

, and may publish the regulation or order of repeal in the manner the lieutenant governor considers proper.

History.

(§ 9 art II (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 5 ch 40 SLA 1969)

Sec. 44.62.125.
Regulations attorney.

In the Department of Law a particular attorney, called the regulations attorney, shall be assigned, as the attorney’s primary responsibility, the functions relating to the handling of administrative regulations.

The department shall

advise all state administrative agencies of the nature and use of administrative regulations;

alert the agencies to statutes that need to be implemented, interpreted, or made clear by regulation;

continually review the regulations, make recommendations to the respective agencies concerning deficiencies, conflicts, and obsolete provisions in and the need for reorganization or revision of the regulations, and prepare regulations to be adopted by the agencies, correcting or removing the deficiencies, conflicts, and obsolete provisions;

work with all administrative agencies possessing regulation-making power in drafting all new regulations, advising the agencies of legal problems encountered, and ensuring compliance with the drafting manual for administrative regulations prepared by the Department of Law under AS

44.62.050

;

assist the agencies in holding public hearings under AS

44.62.210

;

to the extent necessary after regulations have been filed by the lieutenant governor, edit and revise them for consolidation into the Alaska Administrative Code in the manner provided for the revisor of statutes under AS

01.05.031

;

draft bills for consideration by the governor to transfer matter that should be statutory law from the Alaska Administrative Code to the Alaska Statutes and to clarify agency regulatory power when clarification is needed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 58 SLA 1969; am § 3 ch 64 SLA 1978)